Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4723
Members; expenses.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services as such but shall be reimbursed for expenses in attending meetings of the commission and in carrying out their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 131;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 66.